Utah statutes.
3-1-22.   Accrued rights not affected by chapter.
This act does not impair nor affect any act, offense committed, or right
accruing, accrued or acquired, or liability, penalty, forfeiture or punishment
incurred prior to the time this act takes effect, but the same may be enjoyed,
asserted, enforced, prosecuted, or inflicted as fully and to the same extent
as if this act had not been passed.
